apertium-ur-hi.ur.dix
	<pardef n="چل__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ونگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ونگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="stem"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کر</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

	<pardef n="رہ__vaux_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>ونگا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ونگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ینگی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نیوالی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>نے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>وں</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یں</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>یے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>و</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>تی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کر</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>کے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ا</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ے</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ی</l><r><s n="vaux"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

	<e lm="چہک"><i>چہک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اخر"><i>اکھر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اڑ"><i>اڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="قراح"><i>قراح</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کود"><i>کود</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھٹک"><i>کھٹک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھسک"><i>کھسک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="گزر"><i>گزر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھٹ"><i>گھٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چمک"><i>چمک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چوک"><i>چوک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھینک"><i>چھینک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جڑ"><i>جڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھپٹ"><i>جھپٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھوم"><i>جھوم</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جھینپ"><i>جھینپ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹہل"><i>ٹہل</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹھہر"><i>ٹھہر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="تڑپ"><i>تڑپ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="تھوک"><i>تھوک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ناچ"><i>ناچ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پڑ"><i>پڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھل"><i>پھل</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھول"><i>پھول</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بج"><i>بج</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="برس"><i>برس</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بکھر"><i>بکھر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھاگ"><i>بھاگ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مان"><i>مان</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="روٹھ"><i>روٹھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لٹک"><i>لٹک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لپیٹ"><i>لپیٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لیٹ"><i>لیٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سمجھ"><i>سمجھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سلجھ"><i>سلجھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سوجھ"><i>سوجھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہانپھ"><i>ہانپھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بیٹھ"><i>بیٹھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مر"><i>مر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھپ"><i>چھپ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="رہ"><i>رہ</i><par n="رہ__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="سک"><i>سک</i><par n="رہ__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چق"><i>چق</i><par n="رہ__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چک"><i>چک</i><par n="رہ__vaux_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="دکھ"><i>دکھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چپک"><i>چپک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اتر"><i>اتر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اٹھ"><i>اٹھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جاگ"><i>جاگ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مکر"><i>مکر</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اڑ"><i>اڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھونک"><i>بھونک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بہہ"><i>بہہ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چمک"><i>چمک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="دھڑ"><i>دھڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چیخ"><i>چیخ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جم"><i>جم</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="بھڑک"><i>بھڑک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھول"><i>پھول</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہانپھ"><i>ہانپھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اڑ"><i>اڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہچک"><i>ہچک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹوٹ"><i>ٹوٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھٹ"><i>پھٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="جن"><i>جن</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھنس"><i>پھنس</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="تڑک"><i>تڑک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھنک"><i>کھنک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="اگ"><i>اگ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پڑ"><i>پڑ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھانس"><i>کھانس</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چٹک"><i>چٹک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کھسک"><i>کھسک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="کود"><i>کود</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="گھٹ"><i>گھٹ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ہار"><i>ہار</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پس"><i>پس</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="پھپھک"><i>پھپھک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="ٹک"><i>ٹک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="غل"><i>غل</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="مچل"><i>مچل</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="گونج"><i>گونج</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="لانگھ"><i>لانگھ</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
	<e lm="چھلک"><i>چھلک</i><par n="چل__vblex_iv"/></e>
